Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201448-644
Benefits; payment; appeal not a supersedeas;
reversal; effect.

Benefits shall be promptly paid in accordance
with a determination or redetermination. If pursuant to a determination or
redetermination benefits are payable in any amount as to which there is no
dispute, such amount of benefits shall be promptly paid regardless of any
appeal. The commencement of a proceeding for judicial review pursuant to section
48-638 shall not operate as a supersedeas or stay. If an employer is otherwise entitled to noncharging of benefits
pursuant to sections 48-630 and 48-652, and a decision allowing
benefits is finally reversed, no employer's account shall be charged with
benefits paid pursuant to the erroneous determination, and benefits shall
not be paid for any subsequent weeks of unemployment involved in such reversal.

Laws 1941, c. 94, § 4, p. 389;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-706;

R.S.1943, § 48-644;

Laws 1972, LB 1392, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB1058, § 6.

Generally, where there has been an award of benefits, the employee is not to be left without those benefits during appeal. Gibson v. Kurt Mfg., 255 Neb. 255, 583 N.W.2d 767 (1998).